src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-A-I-waahkayi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - waahkayi - ok : # -m animate intransitive verb, go home AEW NA1
     Neg+Fut+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+3Sg+INTERR: máátáakaahkayiwatsiksi
     Dur+PN/o't+waahkayi+VAI+Sbj+1Sg: áó'taahkayiniki
     Neg+Fut+PV/ohkott+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+1Sg+INTERR: nimáátaakohkottaahkayihpa
     Imm+waahkayi+VAI+Cnj+3Pl: otáyaakaahkayssi
     Fut+PV/oht+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitáakohtaahkayi
     Fut+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+2Sg: kitáakaahkayi
     Imm+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+PRO+3/0: áyaakaahkayiyaawa
     PV/máak+PN/sa+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+3Sg+INTERR: máakssawaahkayíwatsiksi
     PV/ááhk+waahkayi+VAI+Cnj+3Sg: ááhkaahkayssi
     Fut+PN/sa+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+3Sg+INTERR: áakssawaahkayiwatsiksi
     Fut+PV/itam+PV/it+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áakitamitaahkayiwa
     Fut+waahkayi+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áakaahkayiwa
     PV/ááhk+waahkayi+VAI+Cnj+1Sg: nááhkaahkayssi
